Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-109
Books; removal; penalty.

If any person not authorized by the regulations made by the directors shall take a book from the library, either with or without the consent of the librarian, he shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1871, § 15, p. 54;

R.S.1913, § 3788;

C.S.1922, § 3181;

Laws 1929, c. 64, § 3, p. 241;

C.S.1929, § 51-109;

R.S.1943, § 51-109;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 307.